Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2372.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6599YH (2) 91 sc/ns H.F. 2372 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 8A.331 Mechanical insulation 1 inspections. 2 1. For purposes of this section: 3 a. âAssessmentâ means a mechanical insulation energy and 4 safety assessment that analyzes potential energy savings and 5 public health risks associated with a buildingâs mechanical 6 insulation. 7 b. âMechanical insulationâ means insulation materials, 8 facings, and accessory products of mechanical systems, 9 including but not limited to piping, equipment, vessels, 10 and boilers, and heating, ventilation, and air conditioning 11 systems. 12 c. âPublic buildingâ means a structure that is owned in 13 whole or in part by the state. 14 d. âQualified mechanical insulation contractorâ means a 15 mechanical insulation contractor who is an active participant 16 in an apprenticeship program approved by the United States 17 department of labor. 18 2. The department shall contract with a qualified 19 mechanical insulation contractor to perform an assessment of 20 each public building within ten years of the effective date of 21 this Act. The assessment must indicate any remediation effort 22 necessary to minimize energy loss and ensure public health 23 and safety. The department shall post the findings of each 24 assessment on the departmentâs internet site within thirty days 25 of the assessment. 26 3. If an assessment identifies a mechanical insulation 27 remediation measure that would reduce carbon emissions for the 28 public building by more than thirty percent and result in a 29 cumulative energy savings of more than thirty percent, then the 30 department shall contract for such remediation measure within 31 twelve months of the assessment. If a public health or safety 32 concern is identified in the assessment, the department shall 33 contract for immediate remediation. 34 4. This section is repealed July 1, 2037. 35 -1- LSB 6599YH (2) 91 sc/ns 1/ 2 H.F. 2372